Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-825
Act, how construed.

The provisions of the Interlocal Cooperation Act shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative, and complete method for the doing of the things authorized by the act and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to, and not in derogation of, powers conferred upon political subdivisions, agencies, and others by law. Insofar as the provisions of the Interlocal Cooperation Act are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, administrative order, or regulation, the provisions of the Interlocal Cooperation Act shall be controlling.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 25.